tests/verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../wal.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../wal.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Verb aac":
    aac<v><iv><pass><shortcnvb><p1><sing> : aacetta

 "Verb arggaac":
    arggaac<v><iv><cau><fut> : arggaacissana

 "Verb aafot":
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><prf> : aafotissibeennee
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><prf> : aafotissibeenna
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><prf> : aafotissidee
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : aafotissii
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : aafotissiis
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : aafotissiisi
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><plr><neg><imfr> : aafotissokkona
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : aafotissokkonaa
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><plr><imfr> : aafotissoosona
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><masc><opt> : aafotisso
   aafot<v><iv><cau><p3><sing><opt> : aafotissona

 "Verb aakk":
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : aasissidagaani
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : aasissidagaap$
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : aasissidagaara
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : aasissidagaas$
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : aasissidaga$
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aasissidagee
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aasissidagee
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aasissidagoo
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aasissidara
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aasissidaree
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aasissidari
   aakk<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aasissidari

 "Verb aakk":
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aassara
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aassaree
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aassari
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aassari
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aassarikko
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aassarini
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : aassarippe
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : aassarira
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : aassarissi
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : aassaridaani
   aakk<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><abs> : aassaro
   aakk<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : aassiyageeta
   aakk<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : aassiyageetee
   aakk<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><nom> : aassiyageeti
   aakk<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : aassiyageetu
   aakk<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+kko<post> : aassiyageetukko
   aakk<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : aassiyageetuni
 
 "Verb aal":
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aalissiyogee
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aalissiyogee
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aalissiyogoo
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aalissiyora
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aalissiyoree
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aalissiyori
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aalissiyori
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aalissiyorikko
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aalissiyorini
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : aalissiyorippe
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : aalissiyorira
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : aalissiyorissi
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : aalissiyorid$
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><abs> : aalissiyoro
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : aalissidageeta
   aal<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : aalissidageetee

 "Verb aammot":
   aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : aammotiyogeetu
   aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+kko<post> : aammotiyogeetukko
   aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : aammotiyogeetuni
   aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : aammotiyogeetuppe
   aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : aammotiyogeetura
   aammot<v><iv><rel><impf><nsub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : aammotiyogeetussi

 "Verb aatt":
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : aattidogaadaani
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aattidogee
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aattidogee
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aattidogoo
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aattidora
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aattidoree
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aattidori
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aattidori
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aattidorikko
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aattidorini
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : aattidorippe
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : aattidorira
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : aattidorissi
   aatt<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : aattidoridaani
 
 "Verb aawat":
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : aawatagee
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : aawatagee
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : aawatagoo
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : aawatara
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : aawataree
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><inter> : aawatari
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : aawatari
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aawatarikko
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aawatarini
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : aawatarippe
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : aawatarira
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : aawatarissi
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : aawataridaani
   aawat<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><abs> : aawataro
   aawat<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : aawatiyageeta
   aawat<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : aawatiyageetee
   aawat<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><nom> : aawatiyageeti
   aawat<v><tv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : aawatiyageetu
 

 "Verb afuxx":
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : afuxissiyageet$  
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : afuxissiyagee$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : afuxissiyageet$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : afuxissiyagee$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : afuxissiyag$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : afuxissiyageetoo
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : afuxissiyagaa
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : afuxissiyagaa
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : afuxissiyaga$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : afuxissiyagaa$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : afuxissiyaga$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : afuxissiyagaa$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : afuxissiyaga$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : afuxissiya$
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : afuxissiyagee
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : afuxissiyagee
   afuxx<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : afuxissiyagoo

 "Verb ag":
    ag<v><tv><p3><sing><masc><prf> : agiis

 "Verb agg":
   agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><plr> : aggidi
   agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><plr> : aggidi
   agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><plr> : aggidi
   agg<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><masc> : aggidi
   agg<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : aggaasi
   agg<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : aggaas
   agg<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><intr><prf> : aggabeikkinaa
   agg<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><prf> : aggabeikke
   agg<v><tv><p1><sing><imfr> : aggays
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><imfr> : aggeettees
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><imfr> : aggettenna
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : aggettennee
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><intr><prf> : aggibeettennee
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><intr><prf> : aggibeokkonii
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><prf> : aggibeettenna
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><neg><prf> : aggibeokko
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><intr><prf> : aggido
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><intr><prf> : aggidonii
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><prf> : aggida
   agg<v><tv><p1><plr><intr><imfr> : aggiyo

 "Verb ak":
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : aissarikko
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : aissarini
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : aissarippe
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : aissarira
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : aissarissi
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : aissaridaani
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><fem><abs> : aissaro
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : aissiyageeta
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : aissiyageetee
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><nom> : aissiyageeti
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : aissiyageetu
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+kko<post> : aissiyageetukko
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : aissiyageetuni
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : aissiyageetuppe
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : aissiyageetura
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : aissiyageetussi
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : aissiyageetuda$
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : aissiyageetoo
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : aissiyagaa
   ak<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : aissiyagaa
